Alabama, session 2026rs, SB309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
41 Section 1. Sections 13A-12-211 and 13A12-231, Code of
42 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
43 "§13A-12-211
44 (a) A person commits the crime of unlawful distribution
45 of controlled substances if, except as otherwise authorized,
46 he or she sells, furnishes, gives away, delivers, or
47 distributes a controlled substance enumerated in Schedules I
48 through V.
49 (b) Unlawful distribution of controlled substances is a
50 Class B felony.
51 (c) A person commits the crime of unlawful possession
52 with intent to distribute a controlled substance if, except as
53 otherwise authorized by law, he or she knowingly possesses any
54 of the following quantities of a controlled substance:
55 (1) More than eight grams, but less than 28 grams, of
56 cocaine or of any mixture containing cocaine.
Page 2

cocaine or of any mixture containing cocaine.
SB309 INTRODUCED
57 (2) More than two grams, but less than four grams, of
58 any mixture of morphine, opium, or any salt, isomer, or salt
59 of an isomer thereof, including heroin or any mixture
60 containing Fentanyl or any synthetic controlled substance
61 Fentanyl or any synthetic controlled substance Fentanyl
62 analogue, as described in Sections 20-2-23 and 20-2-25.
63 (3) More than eight grams, but less than 28 grams, of
64 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine, or of any mixture containing
65 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine.
66 (4) More than eight grams, but less than 28 grams, of
67 5-methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine, or of any mixture
68 containing 5-methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine.
69 (5) More than eight grams, but less than 28 grams, of
70 amphetamine or any mixture containing amphetamine, its salt,
71 optical isomer, or salt of its optical isomer thereof.
72 (6) More than eight grams, but less than 28 grams, of
73 methamphetamine or any mixture containing methamphetamine, its
74 salts, optical isomers, or salt of its optical isomers
75 thereof.
76 (7) More than one-half gram, but less than one gram, of
77 one or more of the following:
78 a. Fentanyl or any synthetic controlled substance
79 Fentanyl analogue, as described in Section 20-2-23 or Section
80 20-2-25, as a single component.
81 b. Any synthetic controlled substance Fentanyl
82 analogue.
83 c. The immediate Fentanyl precursor,
84 4-anilino-N-phenethyl-4-piperidine (ANPP).
Page 3

4-anilino-N-phenethyl-4-piperidine (ANPP).
SB309 INTRODUCED
85 (8) More than two grams, but less than four grams, of
86 any mixture containing Fentanyl or any synthetic controlled
87 substance Fentanyl analogue.
88 (d) Unlawful possession with intent to distribute a
89 controlled substance is a Class B felony."
90 "§13A-12-231
91 Except as authorized in Chapter 2, Title 20:
92 (1) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
93 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
94 actual or constructive possession of, in excess of one kilo or
95 2.2 pounds of any part of the plant of the genus Cannabis,
96 whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, the resin extracted
97 from any part of the plant, and every compound, manufacture,
98 salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its
99 seeds, or resin including the completely defoliated mature
100 stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil, or
101 cake, or the completely sterilized samples of seeds of the
102 plant which are incapable of germination is guilty of a
103 felony, which shall be known as "trafficking in cannabis."
104 Nothing in this subdivision shall apply to samples of
105 tetrahydrocannabinols including, but not limited to, all
106 synthetic or naturally produced samples of
107 tetrahydrocannabinols which contain more than 15 percent by
108 weight of tetrahydrocannabinols and which do not contain plant
109 material exhibiting the external morphological features of the
110 plant cannabis. If the quantity of cannabis involved:
111 a. Is in excess of one kilo or 2.2 pounds, but less
112 than 100 pounds, the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory
Page 4

than 100 pounds, the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory
SB309 INTRODUCED
113 minimum term of imprisonment of three calendar years and to
114 pay a fine of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).
115 b. Is 100 pounds or more, but less than 500 pounds, the
116 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
117 imprisonment of five calendar years and to pay a fine of fifty
118 thousand dollars ($50,000).
119 c. Is 500 pounds or more, but less than 1,000 pounds,
120 the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
121 imprisonment of 15 calendar years and to pay a fine of two
122 hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).
123 d. Is 1,000 pounds or more, the person shall be
124 sentenced to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
125 (2) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
126 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
127 actual or constructive possession of, 28 grams or more of
128 cocaine or of any mixture containing cocaine, described in
129 Section 20-2-25(1), is guilty of a felony, which shall be
130 known as "trafficking in cocaine." If the quantity involved:
131 a. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 500 grams, the
132 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
133 imprisonment of three calendar years and to pay a fine of
134 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
135 b. Is 500 grams or more, but less than one kilo, the
136 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
137 imprisonment of five calendar years and to pay a fine of one
138 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
139 c. Is one kilo, but less than 10 kilos, the person
140 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment
Page 5

shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment
SB309 INTRODUCED
141 of 15 calendar years and to pay a fine of two hundred fifty
142 thousand dollars ($250,000).
143 d. Is 10 kilos or more, the person shall be sentenced
144 to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
145 (3) Any person, except as otherwise authorized by law,
146 who knowingly sells, manufactures, delivers, or brings into
147 this state, or who is knowingly in actual or constructive
148 possession of, four grams or more of any morphine, opium, or
149 any salt, isomer, or salt of an isomer thereof, including
150 heroin, as described in Section 20-2-23(b)(2) or Section
151 20-2-25(1)a., or four grams or more of any mixture containing
152 any such substance, or any mixture containing Fentanyl or any
153 synthetic controlled substance Fentanyl analogue, as described
154 in Sections 20-2-23 and 20-2-25, is guilty of a felony, which
155 shall be known as "trafficking in illegal drugs." If the
156 quantity involved:
157 a. Is four grams or more, but less than 14 grams, the
158 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
159 imprisonment of three calendar years and to pay a fine of
160 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
161 b. Is 14 grams or more, but less than 28 grams, the
162 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
163 imprisonment of 10 calendar years and to pay a fine of one
164 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
165 c. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 56 grams, the
166 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
167 imprisonment of 25 calendar years and to pay a fine of five
168 hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
Page 6

hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
SB309 INTRODUCED
169 d. Is 56 grams or more, the person shall be sentenced
170 to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
171 (4) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
172 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
173 actual or constructive possession of 1,000 or more pills or
174 capsules of methaqualone, as described in Section 20-2-1, et
175 seq., is guilty of a felony, which shall be known as
176 "trafficking in illegal drugs." If the quantity involved:
177 a. Is 1,000 pills or capsules, but less than 5,000
178 pills or capsules, the person shall be sentenced to a
179 mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of three calendar years
180 and pay a fine of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
181 b. Is 5,000 capsules or more, but less than 25,000
182 capsules, the person shall be imprisoned to a mandatory
183 minimum term of imprisonment of 10 calendar years and pay a
184 fine of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
185 c. Is 25,000 pills or more, but less than 100,000 pills
186 or capsules, the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory
187 minimum term of imprisonment of 25 calendar years and pay a
188 fine of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
189 d. Is 100,000 capsules or more, the person shall be
190 sentenced to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
191 (5) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
192 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
193 actual or constructive possession of 500 or more pills or
194 capsules of hydromorphone, as is described in Section 20-2-1,
195 et seq., is guilty of a felony, which shall be known as
196 "trafficking in illegal drugs." If the quantity involved:
Page 7

"trafficking in illegal drugs." If the quantity involved:
SB309 INTRODUCED
197 a. Is 500 pills or capsules or more but less than 1,000
198 pills or capsules, the person shall be sentenced to a
199 mandatory term of imprisonment of three calendar years and to
200 pay a fine of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
201 b. Is 1,000 pills or capsules or more, but less than
202 4,000 pills or capsules, the person shall be sentenced to a
203 mandatory term of imprisonment of 10 calendar years and to pay
204 a fine of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
205 c. Is 4,000 pills or capsules or more but less than
206 10,000 pills or capsules, the person shall be sentenced to a
207 mandatory term of imprisonment of 25 calendar years and to pay
208 a fine of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
209 d. Is more than 10,000 pills or capsules, the person
210 shall be sentenced to a mandatory term of life.
211 (6) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
212 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
213 actual or constructive possession of, 28 grams or more of
214 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine, or of any mixture containing
215 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine, is guilty of a felony, which
216 shall be known as "trafficking in illegal drugs." If the
217 quantity involved:
218 a. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 500 grams, the
219 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
220 imprisonment of three calendar years and to pay a fine of
221 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
222 b. Is 500 grams or more, but less than one kilo, the
223 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
224 imprisonment of five calendar years and to pay a fine of one
Page 8

imprisonment of five calendar years and to pay a fine of one
SB309 INTRODUCED
225 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
226 c. Is one kilo, but less than 10 kilos, the person
227 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment
228 of 15 calendar years and to pay a fine of two hundred fifty
229 thousand dollars ($250,000).
230 d. Is 10 kilos or more, the person shall be sentenced
231 to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
232 (7) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
233 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
234 actual or constructive possession of, 28 grams or more of
235 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine, or of any mixture
236 containing 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine, is guilty
237 of a felony, which shall be known as "trafficking in illegal
238 drugs." If the quantity involved:
239 a. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 500 grams, the
240 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
241 imprisonment of three calendar years and to pay a fine of
242 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
243 b. Is 500 grams or more, but less than one kilo, the
244 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
245 imprisonment of five calendar years and to pay a fine of one
246 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
247 c. Is one kilo, but less than 10 kilos, the person
248 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment
249 of 15 calendar years and to pay a fine of two hundred fifty
250 thousand dollars ($250,000).
251 d. Is 10 kilos or more, the person shall be sentenced
252 to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
Page 9

to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
SB309 INTRODUCED
253 (8) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
254 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
255 actual or constructive possession of, four grams or more of
256 phencyclidine, or any mixture containing phencyclidine, is
257 guilty of a felony, which shall be known as "trafficking in
258 illegal drugs." If the quantity involved:
259 a. Is four grams or more, but less than 14 grams, the
260 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
261 imprisonment of three calendar years and to pay a fine of
262 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
263 b. Is 14 grams or more, but less than 28 grams, the
264 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
265 imprisonment of five calendar years and to pay a fine of one
266 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
267 c. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 56 grams, the
268 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
269 imprisonment of 15 calendar years and to pay a fine of two
270 hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
271 d. Is 56 grams or more, the person shall be sentenced
272 to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
273 (9) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
274 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
275 actual or constructive possession of, four grams or more of
276 lysergic acid diethylamide, or four grams or more of any
277 mixture containing lysergic acid diethylamide, is guilty of a
278 felony, which shall be known as "trafficking in illegal
279 drugs." If the quantity involved:
280 a. Is four grams or more, but less than 14 grams, the
Page 10

a. Is four grams or more, but less than 14 grams, the
SB309 INTRODUCED
281 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
282 imprisonment of three calendar years and to pay a fine of
283 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
284 b. Is 14 grams or more, but less than 28 grams, the
285 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
286 imprisonment of 10 calendar years and to pay a fine of one
287 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
288 c. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 56 grams, the
289 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
290 imprisonment of 25 calendar years and to pay a fine of five
291 hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
292 d. Is 56 grams or more, the person shall be sentenced
293 to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
294 (10) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
295 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
296 actual or constructive possession of, 28 grams or more of
297 amphetamine or any mixture containing amphetamine, its salt,
298 optical isomer, or salt of its optical isomer thereof, is
299 guilty of a felony, which shall be known as "trafficking in
300 amphetamine." If the quantity involved:
301 a. Is 28 grams or more but less than 500 grams, the
302 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
303 imprisonment of three calendar years and to pay a fine of
304 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
305 b. Is 500 grams or more, but less than one kilo, the
306 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
307 imprisonment of five calendar years and to pay a fine of one
308 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
Page 11

hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
SB309 INTRODUCED
309 c. Is one kilo but less than 10 kilos, the person shall
310 be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 15
311 calendar years and to pay a fine of two hundred fifty thousand
312 dollars ($250,000).
313 d. Is 10 kilos or more, the person shall be sentenced
314 to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
315 (11) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
316 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
317 actual or constructive possession of, 28 grams or more of
318 methamphetamine or any mixture containing methamphetamine, its
319 salts, optical isomers, or salt of its optical isomers
320 thereof, is guilty of a felony, which shall be known as
321 "trafficking in methamphetamine." If the quantity involved:
322 a. Is 28 grams or more but less than 500 grams, the
323 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
324 imprisonment of three calendar years and to pay a fine of
325 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
326 b. Is 500 grams or more, but less than one kilo, the
327 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
328 imprisonment of five calendar years and to pay a fine of one
329 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
330 c. Is one kilo but less than 10 kilos, the person shall
331 be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 15
332 calendar years and to pay a fine of two hundred fifty thousand
333 dollars ($250,000).
334 d. Is 10 kilos or more, the person shall be sentenced
335 to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
336 (12) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
Page 12

(12) Any person who knowingly sells, manufactures,
SB309 INTRODUCED
337 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in
338 actual or constructive possession of 56 or more grams of a
339 synthetic controlled substance or a synthetic controlled
340 substance analogue, as described in Section 20-2-23(a)(4) or
341 (5), except for any synthetic controlled substance Fentanyl
342 analogue referenced in subdivision (13), is guilty of a
343 felony, which shall be known as "trafficking in synthetic
344 controlled substances." If the quantity involved:
345 a. Is 56 grams or more, but less than 500 grams, the
346 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
347 imprisonment of three calendar years and to pay a fine of
348 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
349 b. Is 500 grams or more, but less than 1 kilo, the
350 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
351 imprisonment of 10 calendar years and to pay a fine of one
352 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
353 c. Is one kilo, but less than 10 kilos, the person
354 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment
355 of 15 calendar years and to pay a fine of two hundred fifty
356 thousand dollars ($250,000).
357 d. Is 10 kilos or more, the person shall be sentenced
358 to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
359 (13) Any person, unless otherwise authorized by law,
360 who knowingly sells, manufactures, delivers, or brings into
361 this state, or who is knowingly in actual or constructive
362 possession of, one gram or more of Fentanyl or any combination
363 of one or more of the following: (i) Fentanyl or any synthetic
364 controlled substance Fentanyl analogue, as a single component
Page 13

controlled substance Fentanyl analogue, as a single component
SB309 INTRODUCED
365 as described in Sections 20-2-23 and 20-2-25,; (ii) any
366 synthetic controlled substance Fentanyl analogue; or (iii) the
367 immediate Fentanyl precursor,
368 4-anilino-N-phenethyl-4-piperidine (ANPP); is guilty of a
369 felony, which shall be known as "trafficking in illegal
370 drugs." If the quantity involved:
371 a.1. Is one gram or more, but less than two grams, the
372 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
373 imprisonment of three calendar years and to pay a minimum fine
374 of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
375 2. Is two grams or more, but less than four grams, the
376 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
377 imprisonment of 10 calendar years and to pay a minimum fine of
378 one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
379 3. Is four grams or more, but less than eight grams,
380 the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
381 imprisonment of 25 calendar years and to pay a minimum fine of
382 five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
383 4. Is eight grams or more, the person shall be
384 sentenced to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life and to
385 pay a minimum fine of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
386 ($750,000).
387 b.1. Notwithstanding any provision of law, in addition
388 to any penalties provided by law, upon a second conviction of
389 this subdivision, the person shall be sentenced to an
390 additional term of imprisonment of five calendar years, which
391 is not subject to suspension or probation.
392 2. Upon a third or subsequent conviction of this
Page 14

2. Upon a third or subsequent conviction of this
SB309 INTRODUCED
393 subdivision, in addition to any penalties provided by law, the
394 person shall be sentenced to an additional term of
395 imprisonment of 10 calendar years, which is not subject to
396 suspension or probation.
397 (14) Any person, except as otherwise authorized by law,
398 who knowingly sells, manufactures, delivers, or brings into
399 this state, or who is knowingly in actual or constructive
400 possession of, four grams or more of any mixture containing
401 Fentanyl or any synthetic controlled substance Fentanyl
402 analogue is guilty of a felony, which shall be known as
403 "trafficking in illegal drugs." If the quantity involved:
404 a.1. Is four grams or more, but less than 14 grams, the
405 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
406 imprisonment of three calendar years and to pay a fine of
407 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
408 2. Is 14 grams or more, but less than 28 grams, the
409 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
410 imprisonment of 10 calendar years and to pay a fine of one
411 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
412 3. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 56 grams, the
413 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
414 imprisonment of 25 calendar years and to pay a fine of five
415 hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
416 4. Is 56 grams or more, the person shall be sentenced
417 to a mandatory term of imprisonment of life.
418 b.1. Notwithstanding any provision of law, in addition
419 to any penalties provided by law, upon a second conviction of
420 this subdivision, the person shall be sentenced to an
Page 15

this subdivision, the person shall be sentenced to an
SB309 INTRODUCED
421 additional term of imprisonment of five calendar years, which
422 is not subject to suspension or probation.
423 2. Upon a third or subsequent conviction of this
424 subdivision, in addition to any penalties provided by law, the
425 person shall be sentenced to an additional term of
426 imprisonment of 10 calendar years, which is not subject to
427 suspension or probation.
428 (14)(15) In lieu of the weight ranges listed in
429 subdivision (12), a person may instead be charged with
430 trafficking any substance listed in subdivisions (3) and (12)
431 if that person possesses 50 or more individual packages of
432 that substance. The person shall only be sentenced according
433 to the sentence range provision listed in paragraph a. of each
434 subdivision for the specific substance contained in the 50 or
435 more individual packages if charged pursuant to this
436 subdivision, subdivision (15)(16), or subdivision (16)(17), if
437 applicable. In order to charge a person pursuant to this
438 subdivision, the same substance must be contained in each of
439 the 50 or more individual packages.
440 (15)(16) The felonies of "trafficking in cannabis,"
441 "trafficking in cocaine," "trafficking in illegal drugs,"
442 "trafficking in amphetamine," "trafficking in
443 methamphetamine," and "trafficking in synthetic controlled
444 substances" as defined in subdivisions (1) through (14)(15)
445 shall be treated as Class A felonies for purposes of this
446 title, including sentencing under Section 13A-5-9. Provided,
447 however, that the sentence of imprisonment for a defendant
448 with one or more prior felony convictions who violates
Page 16

with one or more prior felony convictions who violates
SB309 INTRODUCED
449 subdivisions (1) through (14)(15) shall be the sentence
450 provided therein, or the sentence provided under Section
451 13A-5-9, whichever is greater. Provided further, that the fine
452 for a defendant with one or more prior felony convictions who
453 violates subdivisions (1) through (14)(15) shall be the fine
454 provided therein, or the fine provided under Section 13A-5-9,
455 whichever is greater.
456 (16)(17) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
457 contrary, any person who has possession of a firearm during
458 the commission of any act proscribed by this section shall be
459 punished by a term of imprisonment of five calendar years,
460 which shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, the
461 punishment otherwise provided, and a fine of twenty-five
462 thousand dollars ($25,000). The court shall not suspend the
463 five-year additional sentence of the person or give the person
464 a probationary sentence."
465 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
466 1, 2026.
Page 17